fr: Biscuits fourrés aux fruits
en: Fruit-filled biscuits
de: Fruchtgefüllte Kekse
es: Galletas rellenas de fruta
hr: Keksići punjeni voćem
nl: Gevulde koekjes met fruit

en: Fruit biscuits with reduced salt
fr: Biscuits aux fruits hyposodé

en: Fruit biscuits with reduced fat
fr: Biscuits fourrés aux fruits allégé en matière grasse

en: Reduced fat biscuit bar filled with fruits
fr: Barre biscuitée fourrée aux fruits allégée en matière grasse

fr: Pastel de nata, Pastéis de nata
pt: Pastéis de nata, Pastel de nata

en: French toast
fr: Pain perdu

en: Floating island, Refrigerated meringue poached in milk and served in a light custard cream
fr: Ile flottante

en: Mochi
xx: Mochi
fr: Mochi, Mochis
ja: 餅, もち

en: Lo mai chi
xx: Lo mai chi
fr: Perles de coco, Lo mai chi

en: Nut macarons
fr: Macarons aux fruits à coques

en: Macarons, Macaroon, Macaroons, Macaron
de: Macarons
fi: Makronit, Macaronit
fr: Macarons, Macaron, Macaron sec
hr: Makaroni
it: Macaron
ja: マカロン
nl: Macarons
pl: Słodkie makaroniki

fr: Assortiments de macarons
de: Macaron-Mischung
es: Assortment de macarons
it: Assortimento di macaron
ja: マカロンのアソートメント
nl: Macaron assortiment

en: Pastry yule logs
fr: Bûches pâtissières, Bûches de Noël pâtissières

en: Babas
xx: Babas

en: Rum babas, Rum baba, baba au rhum
fr: Babas au rhum, Baba au rhum
hr: Rum baba
it: Babà al rum
nl: Baba au rhum

en: Limoncello babas
de: Limoncello-Babas
es: Babas al limoncello
fr: Babas au limoncello
hr: Limoncello babas
it: Babas al limoncello
nl: Babas met limoncello

en: Armagnac babas
es: Babas al armagnac
fr: Babas à l'armagnac
hr: Armagnac babas
it: Babas all'armagnac
nl: Babas met armagnac

en: Babas with Mirabelle de Lorraine
es: Babas de Mirabelle de Lorraine
fr: Babas à la Mirabelle de Lorraine
hr: Babe s mirabelle de lorraine
it: Babas alla Mirabelle di Lorraine
nl: Babas met Mirabelle de Lorraine

en: Whiskey babas
es: Babas al whisky
fr: Babas au whiskey
hr: Babe viskija
it: Babas al whisky
nl: Babas met whisky

en: Mojito babas
es: Babas al Mojito
fr: Babas au Mojito
hr: Mojito babas
it: Babas al Mojito
nl: Babas met Mojito